Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.317

Physical abuse or sexual misconduct by school employees—Duty to report—Training.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1296-S.SL) ***

(1) A certificated or classified school employee who has knowledge or reasonable cause to believe that a student has been a victim of physical abuse or sexual misconduct by another school employee, shall report such abuse or misconduct to the appropriate school administrator. The school administrator shall cause a report to be made to the proper law enforcement agency if he or she has reasonable cause to believe that the misconduct or abuse has occurred as required under RCW 26.44.030. During the process of making a reasonable cause determination, the school administrator shall contact all parties involved in the complaint.

(2) Certificated and classified school employees shall receive training regarding their reporting obligations under state law in their orientation training when hired and then every three years thereafter. The training required under this subsection may be incorporated within existing training programs and related resources.

(3) Nothing in this section changes any of the duties established under RCW 26.44.030.

[ 2013 c 10 s 4; 2004 c 135 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—2013 c 10: See note following RCW 28A.410.035.